Alabama, session 2026rs, HB386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-26-233, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-26-233
(a) In Elmore County, in addition to any fee or fees
provided for by law there shall be an additional the issuance
fee for a pistol permit or license as provided for in Section
13A-1l-75 in the amount of shall be twenty dollars ($20).
(b) One dollar ($1) of each fee collected under
subsection (a) shall be paid into the county general fund and
the remaining nineteen dollars ($19) of each fee shall be
deposited by the sheriff of the county in any bank located in
the county, into a fund known as the Sheriffs' Law Enforcement
Fund. The fund shall be drawn upon by the sheriff or duly
authorized agent and shall be used exclusively for law
enforcement purposes.
(c) The establishment of the Sheriffs' Law Enforcement
Fund as provided in this section and the use of such the fund
shall in no way diminish or take the place of any other
imbursement or other source of income established for the
sheriff or the operation of his or her office."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB386 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 24-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2